Utah statutes.
26-21-27.   Consumer access to health care facility charges.
Beginning January 1, 2011, a health care facility licensed under this chapter
shall, when requested by a consumer:
(1)  make a list of prices charged by the facility available for the consumer
that includes the facility's:
(a)  in-patient procedures;
(b)  out-patient procedures;
(c)  the 50 most commonly prescribed drugs in the facility;
(d)  imaging services; and
(e)  implants; and
(2)  provide the consumer with information regarding any discounts the
facility provides for:
(a)  charges for services not covered by insurance; or
(b)  prompt payment of billed charges.
